North Dakota, session 69, SB2008.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds
as may be necessary, are appropriated from special funds, to the department of financial
institutions for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the department of financial institutions,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $8,182,839 $0 $8,182,839
Operating expenses 2,146,917 0 2,146,917
Contingency 20,000 0 20,000
Total special funds $10,349,756 $0 $10,349,756
Full-time equivalent positions 35.00 0.00 35.00
SECTION 2. EXEMPTION - LINE ITEM TRANSFERS. Notwithstanding section 54-16-04,
the department of financial institutions may transfer funds between line items within section 1 of
this Act during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The department
of financial institutions shall notify the office of management and budget and the legislative
council of any transfer made pursuant to this section.
Page No. 1 25.0175.01000